Louisiana, session 2026, HB1181.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9038.32(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 33:9038.43
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9038.32. Creation of economic development district
* * *
B. The ordinance shall designate the boundaries of the district. The
boundary of a district shall be a single, contiguous boundary, and no property within
that boundary shall be excluded from the district.
* * *
§9038.43. Voter review of taxes initially levied without election
A. The provisions of this Section shall apply to any district created pursuant
to this Part that is authorized by law to levy a tax directly upon transactions,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2269 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1181
property, or activities within the district and that levied such tax at a time when no
qualified electors resided within the boundaries of the district. Nothing in this
Section shall be construed as legislative approval or ratification of the initial levy of
any such tax.
B. If at any time after the initial levy of the tax there are thirty or more
qualified electors residing within the boundaries of the district, the continuation of
the tax shall be subject to approval by the qualified electors of the district upon
petition of not less than fifteen percent of the qualified electors residing within the
district. The registrar of voters of the parish in which the district is located shall
verify and certify the number of qualified electors residing within the district and the
sufficiency of the petition.
C. Upon certification of a petition meeting the requirements of Subsection
B of this Section, the governing authority of the district shall call a special election
to submit to the qualified electors of the district the proposition of whether to
continue the levy of the tax. The election shall be conducted in the manner provided
by the Louisiana Election Code for elections on tax propositions.
D. No bonds or other obligations payable in whole or in part from the
proceeds of the tax shall be authorized, issued, or incurred after the registrar of
voters certifies the sufficiency of a petition pursuant to this Section and prior to the
promulgation of the results of the election required herein.
E. If a majority of the qualified electors voting in the election approve the
proposition, the tax shall continue in effect. If a majority of those voting do not
approve the proposition, the levy of the tax shall terminate on the first day of the
second calendar month following the promulgation of the results of the election;
however, the tax may remain in effect as necessary to retire outstanding bonds or
other obligations secured by the proceeds of the tax, but in no event beyond the later
of:
(1) The full and final payment or defeasance of such bonds or other
obligations.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2269 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1181
(2) The first day of the second calendar month following the promulgation
of the election results.
F. No bonds or other obligations payable from the proceeds of the tax shall
be authorized or issued after the effective date of termination of the tax pursuant to
Subsection E of this Section.
G. If the qualified electors vote not to continue the tax, no tax pledged to
such bonds or obligations shall thereafter be resubmitted to the voters of the district
for approval and no new bonds or obligations secured by the proceeds of the tax shall
be authorized or issued.
H. No more than one election pursuant to this Section shall be held in any
twelve-month period.
I. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to impair the obligation of
outstanding bonds or other obligations secured by the proceeds of the tax.